Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-512
Powers supplemental; act, how construed.

The powers conferred by the Nebraska Redevelopment Act shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law and shall be independent of and in addition to any other provision of the laws of the state with reference to the matters covered thereby and shall be considered as a complete and independent act and not as amendatory of or limited by any other provisions of the laws of the state. The act and all grants of power, authority, rights, or discretion made to a city and to a contracting public body shall be liberally construed, and all incidental powers necessary to carry into effect the provisions of the act are expressly granted to and conferred upon a city or a contracting public body.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 12.